California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(k) Falsifying or making grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in a client or hospital record or any other record.

(l) Changing the prescription of a physician and surgeon or falsifying verbal or written orders for treatment or a diagnostic regime
 received, whether or not that action resulted in actual client harm.

(m) Failing to maintain confidentiality of client medical information, except as disclosure is otherwise permitted or required by law.

(n) Delegating to an unlicensed employee or person a service that requires the knowledge, skills, abilities, or judgment of a licensee.

(o) Committing any act that would be grounds for denial of a license under Section 480.

(p) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect clients by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of infectious diseases from licensee to client, from client to client, or from client to licensee.

(1) In
 administering this subdivision, the board shall consider referencing the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 63001) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision, the board shall consult with the Medical Board of California, the Board of Podiatric Medicine, the Dental Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, and the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians.

(2) The board shall seek to ensure that licensees are informed of their responsibility to minimize the risk of
 transmission of infectious diseases from health care provider to client, from client to client, and from client to health care provider, and are informed of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risks of transmission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 490, Sec. 10.   (AB 2221)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2570.29.

In addition to other acts constituting unprofessional conduct within the meaning of this chapter, it is unprofessional conduct for a person licensed under this chapter to do any of the following:

(a) Obtain or possess in violation of law, or prescribe, or, except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, optometrist, or podiatrist, to administer to himself or herself, or furnish or administer to another, any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code or any dangerous drug or dangerous device as defined in Section 4022.

(b) Use to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to himself or herself,
 to any other person, or to the public, or that impairs his or her ability to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by his or her license, of any of the following:

(1) A controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A dangerous drug or dangerous device as defined in Section 4022.

(3) Alcoholic beverages.

(c) Be convicted of a criminal offense involving the prescription, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, or the possession of, or falsification of a record pertaining to, the substances described in subdivision (a) of this section, in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive
 evidence thereof.

(d) Be committed or confined by a court of competent jurisdiction for intemperate use of any of the substances described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, in which event the court order of commitment or confinement is prima facie evidence of the commitment or confinement.

(e) Falsify, or make grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any hospital or client record, or any other record, pertaining to the substances described in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 490, Sec. 11.   (AB 2221)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2570.30.

The board shall retain jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation, action or disciplinary proceeding against a license, or to render a decision suspending or revoking a license, regardless of the expiration, lapse, or suspension of the license by operation of law, by order or decision of the board or a court of law, or by the voluntary surrender of a license by the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1079, Sec. 9.   Effective September 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2570.31.

If a license is suspended, the holder may not practice occupational therapy during the term of suspension. Upon the expiration of the term of suspension, the license shall be reinstated and the holder entitled to resume practice under any remaining terms of the discipline, unless it is established to the satisfaction of the board that the holder of the license practiced in this state during the term of suspension. In this event, the board may, after a hearing on this issue alone, revoke the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1079, Sec. 10.   Effective September 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2570.32.

(a) A holder of a license that has been revoked, suspended, or placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of a penalty, including reduction or termination of probation, after a period not less than the applicable following minimum period has elapsed from either the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action, or, if the order of the board or any portion of it was stayed, from the date the disciplinary action was actually implemented in its entirety. The minimum periods that shall elapse prior to a petition are as follows:

(1) For a license that was revoked for any reason other than mental or physical illness, at least three years.

(2) For early termination of probation scheduled for three or more years, at least two years.

(3) For modification of a penalty, reinstatement of a license revoked for mental or physical illness, or termination of probation scheduled for less than three years, at least one year.

(4) The board may, in its discretion, specify in its disciplinary order a lesser period of time, provided that the period shall not be less than one year.

(b) The petition submitted shall contain any information required by the board, which may include a current set of fingerprints accompanied by the fingerprinting fee.

(c) The board shall give notice to the Attorney General of the filing of the petition. The petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given timely notice by letter of the time and place of the hearing on the petition, and an opportunity to present both oral and documentary evidence and argument to the board. The petitioner shall at all times have the burden of proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that he or she is entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(d) The board itself shall hear the petition and the administrative law judge shall prepare a written decision setting forth the reasons supporting the decision.

(e) The board may grant or deny the petition, or may impose any terms and conditions that it reasonably deems appropriate as a condition of reinstatement or reduction of penalty.

(f) The board may refuse to consider a petition while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole or subject to an order of registration pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(g) No petition shall be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1079, Sec. 11.   Effective September 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2570.36.

If a licensee has knowledge that an applicant or licensee may be in violation of, or has violated, any of the statutes or regulations administered by the board, the licensee shall report this information to the board in writing and shall cooperate with the board in providing information or assistance as may be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 32.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2571.

(a) An occupational therapist licensed pursuant to this chapter and approved by the board in the use of physical agent modalities may apply topical medications prescribed by the client’s physician and surgeon, certified nurse-midwife pursuant to Section 2746.51, nurse practitioner pursuant to Section 2836.1, or nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to Section 2837.103 or 2837.104, or physician assistant pursuant to Section 3502.1, if the licensee complies with regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations implementing this section, after meeting and conferring with the Medical Board of California, the California State Board of Pharmacy, and the Physical Therapy Board of California, specifying those topical
 medications applicable to the practice of occupational therapy and protocols for their use.

(c) This section does not authorize an occupational therapist to prescribe medications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 413, Sec. 3.   (AB 2684)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2572.

An occupational therapy corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Sections 13401 and 13401.5 of the Corporations Code, if that corporation, its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this chapter, and other statutes, rules, and regulations applicable to an occupational therapy corporation and the conduct of its affairs. Subject to all applicable statutes, rules, and regulations, an occupational therapy corporation is entitled to practice occupational therapy. With respect to an occupational therapy
 corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the California Board of Occupational Therapy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 290, Sec. 5.   (AB 2671)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.65. Dietitians [2585. - 2586.8.]

2585.

(a) Any person representing himself or herself as a registered dietitian shall meet one of the following qualifications:

(1) Been granted, prior to January 1, 1981, the right to use the term “registered dietitian” by a public or private agency or institution recognized by the State Department of Public Health as qualified to grant the title, provided that person continues to meet all requirements and qualifications periodically prescribed by the agency or institution for the maintenance of that title.

(2) Possess all of the following qualifications:

(A) Be 18 years of age or older.

(B) Satisfactory completion of appropriate academic requirements for the field of dietetics and related disciplines and receipt of a baccalaureate or higher degree from a college or university accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or other regional accreditation agency.

(C) Satisfactory completion of a program of supervised practice for a minimum of 900 hours that is designed to prepare entry level practitioners through instruction and assignments in a clinical setting. Supervisors of the program shall meet minimum qualifications established by public or private agencies or institutions recognized by the State Department of Public Health to establish those qualifications.

(D) Satisfactory completion of an examination administered by a public or private agency or institution recognized by the
 State Department of Public Health as qualified to administer the examinations.

(E) Satisfactory completion of continuing education requirements established by a public or private agency or institution recognized by the State Department of Public Health to establish the requirements.

(b) Any person representing himself or herself as a dietetic technician, registered shall possess all of the following qualifications:

(1) Be 18 years of age or older.

(2) Satisfactory completion of either of the following:

(A) Appropriate academic requirements for dietetic technicians, registered, receipt of an associate’s degree or higher from a college or university accredited by the Western Association of
 Schools and Colleges or other regional accreditation agency, and at least 450 hours of supervised practice experience. Supervisors of practice experiences shall meet the minimum qualifications established by public or private agencies or institutions recognized by the State Department of Public Health to establish the qualifications.

(B) Appropriate academic requirements for the field of dietetics and related disciplines and receipt of a baccalaureate or higher degree from a college or university accredited by the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or other regional accreditation agency.

(3) Satisfactory completion of an examination administered by a public or private agency or institution recognized by the State Department of Public Health to administer the examination.

(4) Satisfactory completion of
 continuing education requirements established by a public or private agency or institution recognized by the State Department of Public Health to establish the requirements.

(c) It is a misdemeanor for any person not meeting the criteria of subdivision (a) or (b) to use, in connection with his or her name or place of business, the words “dietetic technician, registered,” “dietitian,” “dietician,” “registered dietitian,” “registered dietician,” “registered dietitian nutritionist,” or the letters “RD,” “RDN,” “DTR,” or any other words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a dietitian, dietetic technician, registered, registered dietitian, or registered dietitian nutritionist or to represent, in any way, orally, in writing, in print or by sign, directly or by implication, that he or she is a dietitian, a dietetic technician, registered, a registered dietitian, or a registered dietitian nutritionist.

(d) Any person employed by a licensed health care facility as a registered dietitian on the effective date of this chapter may continue to represent himself or herself as a registered dietitian while employed by a licensed health care facility, if he or she has satisfied the requirements of either paragraph (1) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), except that he or she shall not be required to satisfy the examination requirement of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(e) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation that limits reimbursement to state licensed health care providers and upon referral by a physician and surgeon, the following persons may be reimbursed for the nutritional advice or advice concerning proper nutrition as set forth in Section 2068, or for the nutritional assessments, counseling, and treatments as set forth in Section 2586:

(1) Registered dietitians.

(2) Other nutritional professionals with a master’s or higher degree in a field covering clinical nutrition sciences, from a college or university accredited by a regional accreditation agency, who are deemed qualified to provide these services by the referring physician and surgeon.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to mandate direct reimbursement of registered dietitians, or other nutrition professionals described in subdivision (e), as a separate provider type under the Medi-Cal program, nor to mandate reimbursement where expressly prohibited by federal law or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 622, Sec. 1.   (SB 993)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2586.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a registered dietitian, or other nutritional professional meeting the qualifications set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 2585 may, upon referral by a health care provider authorized to prescribe dietary treatments, provide nutritional and dietary counseling, conduct nutritional and dietary assessments, and develop and recommend nutritional and dietary treatments, including therapeutic diets, for individuals or groups of patients in licensed institutional facilities or in private office settings. The referral for medical nutrition therapy shall be accompanied by a written prescription signed by the health care provider detailing the patient’s diagnosis and including either a statement of the desired objective of dietary
 treatment or a diet order. The registered dietitian, or other nutritional professional meeting the qualifications set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 2585, may perform nutritional assessments and initiate nutritional interventions within the parameters of the prescribed diet order pursuant to a licensed health care facility’s approved nutrition screening policy and procedure. The registered dietitian, or other nutritional professional meeting the qualifications set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 2585, shall collaborate with a multidisciplinary team, which shall include the treating physician and the registered nurse, in developing the patient’s nutrition care plan. Unless otherwise stated in the diet order by a patient’s provider, the registered dietitian, or other nutritional professional meeting the qualifications set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 2585, may individualize the patient’s nutritional or dietary treatment when necessary, by modifying the distribution, type, or quantity of food
 and nutrients within the parameters of the diet order. Any modification, and the rationale for the modification, shall be documented in the patient’s record for review by the practitioner, or other licensed health care professional, who is legally authorized to prescribe and is responsible for the care of the patient. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize a registered dietitian, or other nutritional professional meeting the qualifications set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 2585, to order or administer a central vein or peripheral vein nutrition.

(2) The services described in this subdivision may be termed “medical nutrition therapy.”

(b) A registered
 dietitian, or other nutritional professional meeting the qualifications set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 2585, may accept or transmit verbal orders or electronically transmitted orders for medical nutrition therapy from the referring physician or the physician responsible for the care of the patient in a licensed health care facility.

(c) A registered dietitian, or other nutritional professional meeting the qualifications set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 2585, may order medical laboratory tests related to medical nutrition therapy services when approved by the referring physician or the physician responsible for the care of the patient and when, in the absence of the referring physician or physician responsible for the care of the patient at a patient visit, in a clinic where there is a registered nurse on duty, a registered nurse is notified that a medical laboratory test is being ordered and is afforded an opportunity to assess
 the patient.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a dietetic technician, registered meeting the qualifications set forth in Section 2585 may, under the direct supervision of a registered dietitian, assist in the implementation or monitoring of services specified in subdivision (a), but shall not develop nutritional or dietary therapy or treatments or accept or transmit verbal orders.

(2) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, “direct supervision” means the supervising registered dietitian shall be physically available to the dietetic technician, registered for consultation whenever consultation is required. However, in the case of a small or rural hospital, as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code, the registered dietitian may be available for consultation by telephone or other electronic means, provided that the
 registered dietitian is physically on the facility site a sufficient amount of time to provide adequate supervision over and review of the work of the dietetic technician, registered.

(B) For purposes of this subdivision, “physically available” means physical onsite presence during regular business hours, and includes telephonic or electronic availability at all times and the ability to respond to the facility within a reasonable period of time when required. The registered dietitian shall review any activities performed by the dietetic technician, registered during any period when the registered dietitian was not physically onsite.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a registered dietitian shall not supervise more than two dietetic technicians, registered at one time.

(e) It is a misdemeanor for a person specified
 in subdivision (e) of Section 2585 to practice in a manner inconsistent with the requirements set forth in this section.

(f) Nothing in this section shall preclude a person specified in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 2585 from providing information as permitted by Section 2068.

(g) For purposes of this section, “health care provider” means any person licensed or certified pursuant to this division, or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act.

(h) The requirement of a written prescription shall be deemed to be satisfied by an entry in the patient records of a patient who is undergoing treatment at a licensed health care facility if the contents of the patient records reflect the information required by this section.

(i) Nothing in this section or Section 2585 shall be interpreted to establish educational criteria or practice restrictions or limitations for other health care providers licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) or the Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   (SB 993)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2586.2.

A person may engage in the activities set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2586 if the person meets both of the following requirements:

(a) The person is engaged in the activities as part of a supervised practice program for a registered dietitian pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2585.

(b) The person is enrolled in or has completed a course of study to fulfill the educational requirements for a registered dietitian in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2585.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 69, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2586.4.

A person may engage in the activities set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 2586 if the person meets both of the following requirements:

(a) The person is engaged in the activities as part of a supervised practice program for a dietetic technician, registered pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2585.

(b) The person has completed a course of study to fulfill the educational requirements for a dietetic technician, registered in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2585.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 622, Sec. 3.   (SB 993)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2586.6.

A person may engage in the activities set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 2586 for six months from the date that he or she completed a supervised practice program, or until the person receives notice that he or she failed the examination specified in subdivision (d), whichever occurs first, if all of the following conditions apply:

(a) The person performs under the direct and immediate supervision of a registered dietitian.

(b) The person has completed the supervised practice program requirements under subdivision (a) of Section 2585.

(c) The person has written verification, including the program director’s original signature, that the person has completed the required supervised practice program.

(d) The person has applied to take the registered dietitian examination specified in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2585 and is waiting for an examination date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 69, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2586.8.

A person may engage in the activities set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 2586 for six months from the date he or she completed the academic requirements for dietetic technicians specified in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2585, or until the person receives notice that he or she has failed the examination specified in subdivision (c), whichever occurs first, if all of the following conditions apply:

(a) The person performs under the direct and immediate supervision of a registered dietitian.

(b) The person has written verification, including the program director’s original signature, that the person has completed the educational program
 and possesses an associate’s degree or higher.

(c) The person has applied to take the dietetic technician, registered examination specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 2585 and is waiting for an examination date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 622, Sec. 4.   (SB 993)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.67. Perfusionists [2590. - 2596.]

2590.

(a) For purposes of this section, “perfusion” means those functions necessary for the support, treatment, measurement, or supplementation of the cardiovascular system, circulatory system with or without the oxygenation circuit, or any combination of those activities, and to ensure the safe management of physiologic functions by monitoring the necessary parameters of those systems pursuant to an order and under the supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon.

(b) Perfusion services include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The use of extracorporeal circulation, cardiopulmonary support techniques, and other ancillary therapeutic and diagnostic technologies. “Extracorporeal circulation,” as used in this section, means the diversion of a patient’s blood through a heart-lung machine or a similar device that assumes the functions of the patient’s heart, lungs, or both.

(2) Counterpulsation, ventricular assistance, autotransfusion, including blood conservation techniques, myocardial and organ preservation, extracorporeal life support, and isolated limb perfusion.

(3) The use of techniques involving blood management, advanced life support, and other related functions.

(c) Perfusion services also include, but only during the performance of functions described in subdivision (b), the following:

(1) The administration of pharmacological and therapeutic agents, blood products, or anesthetic agents through the extracorporeal circuit or through an intravenous line as ordered by a physician and surgeon.

(2) The performance and use of anticoagulation analysis, physiologic monitoring, blood gas and chemistry analysis, hematocrit analysis, hypothermia, hyperthermia, hemoconcentration, and hemodilution. Nothing in this paragraph shall exempt perfusionists from the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200), including, but not limited to, quality assurance and equipment maintenance requirements.

(3) The observation of signs and symptoms related to perfusion services.

(4) Making a determination whether the signs and symptoms related to perfusion services exhibit abnormal characteristics.

(5) Implementation, based on observed abnormalities, of appropriate reporting, or perfusion protocols, or changes in treatment regimen, pursuant to an order by a physician and surgeon, or the initiation of emergency procedures. “Perfusion protocols” as used in this section means perfusion-related policies and protocols developed or approved by a licensed health facility or a physician and surgeon through collaboration with administrators and health professionals, including perfusionists.

(d) Commencing January 1, 1993, no person shall hold himself or herself out as a perfusionist, unless at the time of doing so the person meets the educational and examination requirements specified in subdivisions (e) and (f).

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), persons holding themselves out as perfusionists shall be graduates of a training program described in Section 2592 and produce satisfactory evidence of successful completion of the entire examination of the American Board of Cardiovascular Perfusion, or its successor agency, or the equivalent thereof if an equivalent is determined to be necessary by the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California.

(f) Any person may be deemed to have completed the equivalent of the examination and education requirements if that person is currently certified by the American Board of Cardiovascular Perfusion, or if, as of January 1, 1993, the person has practiced as a perfusionist and has annually performed a minimum of 40 cases of cardiopulmonary bypass during cardiac surgery in a licensed health facility and has done so for at least five years since January 1, 1987. For the purposes of this subdivision, “licensed health facility” means a health facility licensed in any jurisdiction within the United States.

(g) In order to continue to use the title of “perfusionist,” the person shall complete the continuing education requirements of, or maintain active certification by, the American Board of Cardiovascular Perfusion, or its successor agency, or the equivalent if an equivalent is determined to be necessary by the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California.

(h) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2591.

(a) After completion of an approved perfusion training program, as defined in Section 2592, and until notification of passage of the entire examination of the American Board of Cardiovascular Perfusion, or its successor agency, that person shall identify himself or herself only as a “graduate perfusionist.”

(b) The use of the title “graduate perfusionist” is valid for no more than three years from the date of completion of an approved perfusion training program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2592.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 2590, all persons calling themselves perfusionists shall be graduates of an approved perfusion training program.

(b) For purposes of this article, an “approved perfusion training program” means a training program in perfusion reviewed by the Accreditation Committee on Perfusion Education and approved by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs or its successor or the equivalent training program if an equivalent is determined to be necessary by the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 677, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2593.

(a) During the period of any clinical training provided by an approved perfusion training program, perfusion may be performed by a student enrolled in the approved perfusion training program when those services are part of his or her course of study.

(b) A person enrolled as a student in an approved perfusion training program shall be identified as a “student perfusionist” or as a “perfusion intern.”

(c) During the period of any clinical training, a student perfusionist or perfusion intern shall be under the direct supervision of a perfusionist who has met all the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this section, “direct supervision” means assigned to a perfusionist who is on duty and immediately available in the assigned patient care area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 343, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993)
-------------------------------------------

2595.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit, preclude, or otherwise interfere with the practices of other persons licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under this division in performing perfusion services consistent with the laws governing their respective scopes of practice. None of the activities described in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 2590, including, but not limited to, extracorporeal life support, shall be construed to be exclusively perfusion services, but may be performed by other licensed persons when consistent with their respective scopes of practice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 343, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993)
-------------------------------------------

2596.

It is the intent of the Legislature that authority be reserved to the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California to adopt examination, continuing education, and training standards for perfusionists, with appropriate consultation, in the event that existing standards of the American Board of Cardiovascular Perfusion or the Accreditation Committee on Perfusion Education of the Committee on Allied Health Education and Accreditation of the American Medical Association prove inadequate after an appropriate trial period of at least three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.7. Physical Therapy [2600. - 2696.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration and General Provisions [2600. - 2615.]

2600.

This chapter may be cited as the Physical Therapy Practice Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

2601.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise specified:

(a) “Board” means the Physical Therapy Board of California.

(b) “Physical therapist” means a person who is licensed pursuant to this chapter to practice physical therapy.

(c) “Physical therapist assistant” means a person who is licensed pursuant to this chapter to assist in the provision of physical therapy under the supervision of a licensed physical therapist. “Physical therapy assistant” and “physical therapist assistant” shall be deemed identical and
 interchangeable terms.

(d) “Physical therapist technician” and “physical therapy aide,” as described in Section 2630.4, shall be deemed identical and interchangeable terms.

(e) “Physiotherapy” shall be synonymous with “physical therapy.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 4.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.

(a) The Physical Therapy Board of California, hereafter referred to as the board, shall enforce and administer this chapter.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   (SB 1438)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2602.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Physical Therapy Board of California in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.

The members of the board shall consist of four physical therapists, only one of whom shall be involved in physical therapy education, and three public members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 6.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2603.5.

(a) The physical therapist members of the board shall be appointed from persons having all of the following qualifications:

(1) Be a resident of California.

(2) Possess a valid and unrestricted license in California issued pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Have been licensed pursuant to this chapter and practicing in California for at least five years prior to appointment to the board.

(b) (1) The public members of the board shall have both of the following
 qualifications:

(A) Be appointed from persons having all of the qualifications as set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 450) of Division 1.

(B) Be a resident of California.

(2) No public member of the board shall be, nor have been, any of the following:

(A) An officer or faculty member of any college, school, or institution involved in physical therapy education.

(B) A licentiate of the Medical Board of California or of any board under this division or of any board referred to in Section 1000 or 3600.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 7.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2604.

The members of the board shall be appointed for a term of four years, expiring on the first day of June of each year.

The Governor shall appoint one of the public members and the four physical therapist members of the board qualified as provided in Sections 2603 and 2603.5. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member qualified as provided in Section 2603.5.

No person may serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. Annually, the board shall elect one of its members as president and one of its members as vice
 president.

The appointing power shall have the power to remove any member of the board from office for neglect of any duty required by law or for incompetency or unprofessional or dishonorable conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 389, Sec. 8.   (SB 198)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2605.

The board shall do all of the following:

(a) Evaluate the qualifications of applicants for licensure.

(b) Provide for the examinations of physical therapists and physical therapist assistants and establish a passing score for each examination.

(c) Issue all licenses for the practice of physical therapy in California. Except as otherwise required by the director pursuant to Section 164, the license issued by the board shall describe the licensee as a “physical therapist” or “physical therapist assistant” licensed by the Physical Therapy Board of California.

(d) Suspend and revoke licenses and otherwise enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(e) Administer a continuing competency program.
